District of Columbia statutes.
5-605

Promulgation of rules and regulations by Mayor.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, regulations:

(1)

With respect to the determination and establishment of the reasonable value of the hospital, medical, surgical, or dental care and treatment (including prostheses and medical appliances) furnished or to be furnished, or paid or to be paid; and

(2)

To provide procedures for distributing the proceeds from recoveries and settlements obtained by either the injured or diseased policeman or fireman or the District of Columbia; provided, that in any event said policeman or fireman, or his guardian, personal representative, estate, dependents, or survivors shall have the right to retain not less than one-fifth of the net amount of any money or other property remaining after the expenses of a suit or settlement have been deducted; and in addition at the time of distribution, an amount equivalent to a reasonable attorney’s fee proportionate to the lien of the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 17, 1978, D.C. Law 2-100, § 6, 25 DCR 288

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-606.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-505.
1973 Ed., § 4-1005.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 2-100, see Mayor’s Order 86-63, April 22, 1986.